Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 698.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 698.2. As used in the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice
Act:
1. "Board" means the State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners;
2. "Animal" means any animal other than humans and includes,
but is not limited to, fowl, fish, birds and reptiles, wild or
domestic, living or dead;
3. "Veterinarian" means a person who has received a degree in
veterinary medicine or its equivalent from a school of veterinary
medicine;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. "Licensed veterinarian" means any veterinarian who holds an
active license to practice veterinary medicine in this state;
5. "School of veterinary medicine" means any veterinary college
or division of a university or college that offers the degree of
doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent, which conforms to
the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary
Medical Association (AVMA) and which is recognized and approved by
the Board;
6. "Veterinary technician" means a person who has graduated
from a program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical
Association, or its equivalent which is recognized and approved by
the Board, and who has passed the examination requirements set forth
by the Board, and is certified to practice under the direct
supervision of a licensed veterinarian. For the purpose of the
Oklahoma Veterinary Practice Act, "registered veterinary technician
(RVT)" will be used interchangeably with veterinary technician who
is certified pursuant to Sections 698.21 through 698.26 of this
title;
7. "Veterinary technologist" means a person who has
successfully graduated from an AVMA-accredited bachelor degree
program of veterinary technology, or its AVMA equivalent;
8. "Veterinary assistant" means an individual who may perform
the duties of a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

howe ver, has not graduated from an AVMA-accredited technology
program or its equivalent, and has not been certified by the Board;
9. "Veterinary technology" means the science and art of
providing all aspects of professional medical care, services and
treatment for animals with the exception of diagnosis, prognosis,
surgery and prescription of any treatments, drugs, medications or
appliances, where a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship
exists;
10. "Direct supervision" means:
a. directions have been given to a veterinary technician,
nurse, laboratory technician, intern, veterinary
assistant or other employee for medical care following
the examination of an animal by the licensed
veterinarian responsible for the professional care of
the animal, or
b. that, under certain circumstances following the
examination of an animal by a licensed veterinarian
responsible for the professional care of the animal,
the presence of the licensed veterinarian on the
premises in an animal hospital setting or in the same
general area in a range setting is required after
directions have been given to a veterinarian who has a
certificate issued pursuant to Section 698.8 of this
title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

11. "License" means authorization to practice veterinary
medicine granted by the Board to an individual found by the Board to
meet certain requirements pursuant to the Oklahoma Veterinary
Practice Act or any other applicable statutes;
12. "Supervised Doctor of Veterinary Medicine Certificate"
means authorization to practice veterinary medicine with certain
limitations or restrictions on that practice, set by the Board or
authorization to perform certain enumerated functions peripheral to
the practice of veterinary medicine as set by the Board and has a
certificate issued pursuant to Section 698.8 of this title;
13. "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means when:
a. the licensed veterinarian has assumed the
responsibility for making medical judgments regarding
the health of an animal or animals and the need for
medical treatment, and the client, owner or other
caretaker has agreed to follow the instructions of the
licensed veterinarian, and
b. there is sufficient knowledge of the animal or animals
by the licensed veterinarian to initiate at least a
general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical
condition of the animal or animals in that:
(1) the licensed veterinarian has recently seen or is
personally acquainted with the keeping and care
of the animal or animals, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(2) the licensed veterinarian has made medically
necessary and timely visits to the premises where
the animal or groups of animals are kept or both
maintained and created a herd health plan with
the client within the last twelve (12) months,
and
c. the licensed veterinarian is readily available for
follow-up in case of adverse reactions or failure of
the regimen of therapy, or has arranged for emergency
medical coverage, and
d. the licensed veterinarian's actions would conform to
applicable federal law and regulations;
14. "Veterinary premises" means any facility where the practice
of veterinary medicine occurs including, but not limited to, a
mobile unit, mobile clinic, outpatient clinic, satellite clinic,
public service outreach of a veterinary facility or veterinary
hospital or clinic. The term "veterinary premises" shall not
include the premises of a client of a licensed veterinarian or
research facility;
15. "Veterinary prescription drugs" means such prescription
items as are in the possession of a person regularly and lawfully
engaged in the manufacture, transportation, storage or wholesale or
retail distribution of veterinary drugs and the federal Food and
Drug Administration-approved human drugs for animals which because
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t heir toxicity or other potential for harmful effects, or method
of use, or the collateral measures necessary for use, are labeled by
the manufacturer or distributor in compliance with federal law and
regulations to be sold only to or on the prescription order or under
the supervision of a licensed veterinarian for use in the course of
professional practice. Veterinary prescription drugs shall not
include over-the-counter products for which adequate directions for
lay use can be written;
16. "ECFVG certificate" means a certificate issued by the
American Veterinary Medical Association Education Commission for
Foreign Veterinary Graduates, indicating that the holder has
demonstrated knowledge and skill equivalent to that possessed by a
graduate of an accredited or approved college of veterinary
medicine;
17. "Executive Director" means the Executive Director of the
State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners or the authorized
representative of such official;
18. "Telemedicine" or "telehealth" means the practice of
veterinary medicine including diagnosis, consultation, evaluation,
treatment, transfer of medical data or exchange of information by
means of a two-way, real-time interactive communication between a
client or patient and a veterinarian with access to and reviewing
the patient's relevant information prior to the telemedicine visit.
Telemedicine or telehealth shall not include consultations provided
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

by t elephone audio-only communication. A veterinarian using
telehealth technologies shall take appropriate steps to establish
the veterinarian-client-patient relationship by an in-person
examination within the last twelve (12) months and conduct all
appropriate evaluations and history of the patient consistent with
traditional standards of care for the particular patient
presentation. A veterinarian shall be licensed, or under the
jurisdiction of, the veterinary board of the jurisdiction where the
patient is located. The practice of medicine occurs where the
patient is located at the time telehealth technologies are used and
the relationship may not be established solely by telephone or
electronic means;
19. "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
association, joint venture, cooperative, corporation or any other
group or combination acting in concert, and whether or not acting as
a principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver or as any other kind of
legal or personal representative, or as the successor in interest,
assignee, agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer,
fictitious name certificate or any other representative of such
person;
20. "Food animal" means any mammalian, poultry, fowl, fish or
other animal that is raised primarily for human food consumption;
21. "Surgery" means the branch of veterinary science conducted
under elective or emergency circumstances, which treats diseases,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inju ries and deformities by manual or operative methods including,
but not limited to, cosmetic, reconstructive, ophthalmic,
orthopedic, vascular, thoracic and obstetric procedures. The
provisions in Section 698.12 of this title shall not be construed as
surgery;
22. "Abandonment" means to forsake entirely or to neglect or
refuse to provide or perform the legal obligations for care and
support of an animal by its owner, or the owner's agent.
Abandonment shall constitute the relinquishment of all rights and
claims by the owner to an animal;
23. "Animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" means
treatment that includes vertebral subluxation complex (VSC) and
spinal manipulation of nonhuman vertebrates. The term "animal
chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" shall not be construed to
allow the:
a. use of x-rays,
b. performing of surgery,
c. dispensing or administering of medications, or
d. performance of traditional veterinary care;
24. "Animal euthanasia technician" means an employee of a law
enforcement agency, an animal control agency or animal shelter that
is recognized and approved by the Board, who is certified by the
Board and trained to administer sodium pentobarbital to euthanize
injured, sick, homeless or unwanted domestic pets and other animals;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

25. "Teeth floating", as provided by a nonveterinary equine
dental care provider, means the removal of enamel points and the
smoothing, contouring and leveling of dental arcades and incisors of
equine and other farm animals. It shall not include dental
procedures on canines and felines;
26. "Nonveterinary reproductive services" means nonveterinary
services provided by an individual certified by the Board as a
nonveterinary reproductive services technician, and involves and
shall be limited to nonsurgical embryo transfer in ruminating
animals including cattle, sheep, goats, farmed deer and other
ruminating exotic animals such as those found in zoos, and may
include basic ultrasonography of their ovaries to evaluate the
response to embryo-transfer-associated procedures and of the uterus
to determine pregnancy by the detection of a heartbeat within the
transferred embryo at or greater than twenty-eight (28) days of
gestation of such ruminating animals;
27. "Embryo transfer" means the biosecure process of inducing
increased ovulations within a donor female for the in vivo
production of embryos, the flushing of those embryos, collecting,
grading and transferring of those embryos to recipient females or
the cryopreservation of those embryos for storage and later transfer
to recipient females;
28. "Animal Technology Advisory Committee" means the advisory
committee established by the Board pursuant to Section 698.30b of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

this title to advise and make recommendations to the Board regarding
any new and evolving technology, procedure, method or practice that
may be considered or otherwise designated as an act of animal
husbandry that should be included as an act not prohibited in
paragraph 1 of Section 698.12 of the Oklahoma Veterinary Practice
Act. Reference to the advisory committee in this act shall mean the
Animal Technology Advisory Committee;
29. "Examination Committee" means the committee established and
described in subsection D of Section 698.30a of this title related
to nonveterinary reproductive services; and
30. "Probable Cause Committee" means the committee consisting
of the Board's secretary or treasurer, investigator and attorney to
negotiate and settle disputes in accordance with the Oklahoma
Veterinary Practice Act;
31. "Medical records" means any form of documentation that
provides a current and accurate account of a patient or herd history
and relevant medical information. Each licensed veterinarian
engaged in the practice shall maintain a complete, legible, written
or computer-generated record concerning the patient or herd;
32. "Relief veterinarian" means a licensed veterinarian who
works on a temporary or contract basis, who performs the duties of a
full-time veterinarian. He or she is required to maintain accurate
medical records that allow another veterinarian to proceed with care
and treatment and promote continuity of care for the animal; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

33. "Herd health plan" means a documented plan provided by a
licensed veterinarian with a veterinarian-client-patient
relationship that establishes the treatment and supportive care for
a group of animals to enhance a good herd management and optimize
animal health and productivity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
April 13, 2026 - DO PASS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3239 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)